Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-274
County supervisors; chairman; duties.

The board at its regular meeting of each year shall organize by choosing one of its number as chairman, who shall preside at all meetings of the board during the year; and in case of his absence at any meeting, the members present shall choose one of their number as temporary chairman.

Laws 1879, § 65, p. 372;

R.S.1913, § 1066;

C.S.1922, § 968;

C.S.1929, § 26-282;

R.S.1943, § 23-274.